South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1216.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Natural Resources, relating to Turkey Hunting Rules and Seasons, designated as Regulation Document Number 5259, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The Department of Natural Resources proposes to amend Regulation 123-51 "Turkey Hunting Rules and Seasons." The subject of the proposed action is to amend the regulations to prescribe seasons, dates, bag limits, and details of hunting and taking of turkeys on Wildlife Management Areas. The following is a summary of the proposed changes and additions: The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on October 27, 2023, Volume 47, Issue No. 10. ----XX----